Washington statutes.
RCW 42.16.011

State payroll revolving account—Use.

A state payroll revolving account is created in the state treasury, for the payment of compensation to employees and officers of the state and distribution of all amounts withheld therefrom pursuant to law and amounts authorized by employees to be withheld pursuant to law; also for the payment of the state's contributions for retirement and insurance and other employee benefits: PROVIDED, That the utilization of the state payroll revolving account shall be optional except for agencies whose payrolls are prepared under a centralized system established pursuant to regulations of the director of financial management.

[ 2012 c 198 s 20; 1985 c 57 s 25; 1981 c 9 s 1; 1979 c 151 s 69; 1969 c 59 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 25 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 198: See note following RCW 70A.15.5110.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

Transfer from state payroll revolving fund: "All moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the state payroll revolving fund shall be transferred on the effective date of this act to the state payroll revolving account." [ 1981 c 9 s 7.] The effective date of 1981 c 9 was February 27, 1981.